Illinois, session 104th, SB521.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Project Labor Agreements Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 571/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Project Labor Agreements Act.9(Source: P.A. 97-199, eff. 7-27-11.)